src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc
LEXICON Conjunctions
    an+CCONJ:an     #   "for, moreover, plus" ;
    apa+CCONJ:apa   #   "but" ;

    ar+CCONJ:ar     #   "and" ;
    a+CCONJ:a       #   "and" ;

    cé+SCONJ:cé     #   "if" ;
    ce+SCONJ:ce     #   "if" ;
    
    írë+SCONJ:íre   #   "when" ;
    nan+CCONJ:nan   #   "but" ;
    qui+SCONJ:qui   #   "if" ;
